New Mexico, session 2026, SB174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Gross Receipts and Compensating Tax Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] DEDUCTION--GROSS RECEIPTS FROM THE SALE OF GOLD AND SILVER COINS OR BULLION.-- A. Prior to July 1, 2031, receipts from the sale of gold and silver coins or bullion may be deducted from gross receipts. B. A taxpayer allowed the deduction pursuant to this section shall report the amount of the deduction to the department in a manner required by the department. C. The deduction provided by this section shall be included in the tax expenditure budget pursuant to Section 7-1-84 NMSA 1978, including the annual aggregate cost of the deduction. D. As used in this section, "bullion" means a bar, an ingot or a commemorative medallion where the value of the metal depends on its content and not the form." SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. - 2 -